Maryland, session 2025, HB0978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (3) (I) [Civil] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, CIVIL penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring
camera, bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are
collected by the District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this
section and distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(II) 1. THE FINES COLLECTED BY THE DISTRICT COURT AS
A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON
INTERSTATE 695 AND INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY SHALL BE REMITTED
TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION TO BE USED SOLELY TO ASSIST:
A. RECOVER THE COST OF IMPLEMENTING AND
ADMINISTERING THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 695 AND
INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY; AND
B. ASSIST IN COVERING THE COST OF ROADWAY AND
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON INTERSTATE 695 AND INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE
COUNTY.
2. FINES REMITTED TO THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH ARE
SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND ARE NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT
WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPROPRIATED FOR USES DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
10–311.
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 [or], § 21–810, OR § 21–811 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of Title 21, Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
Article – Transportation

HOUSE BILL 978 3
21–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR
LONGER.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL OR LEASING COMPANY;
OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS AN IMAGE RECORDED BY A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:
1. A PHOTOGRAPH;
2. A MICROPHOTOGRAPH;
3. AN ELECTRONIC IMAGE;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING:
1. THE REAR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE;
2. AT LEAST TWO TIME–STAMPED IMAGES OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT INCLUDE THE SAME STATIONARY OBJECT NEAR THE MOTOR
VEHICLE; AND
3. ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE OR PORTION OF TAPE, A
CLEAR AND LEGIBLE IDENTIFICATION OF THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.

HOUSE BILL 978
(4) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE HAVING ONE OR
MORE MOTOR VEHICLE SENSORS CONNECTED TO A CAMERA SYSTEM CAPABLE OF
PRODUCING RECORDED IMAGES OF MOTOR VEHICLES.
(5) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO HAS BEEN TRAINED AND CERTIFIED TO OPERATE A SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM AND WHO IS:
(I) A POLICE OFFICER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE
POLICE;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE
POLICE; OR
(III) A STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION CONTRACTOR.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY PLACE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS THAT
MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF MOTOR
VEHICLES TRAVELING ON INTERSTATE 695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(II) 1. NOT MORE THAN FOUR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS
IN EACH DIRECTION MAY BE OPERATED ON A HIGHWAY SPECIFIED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AT LOCATIONS IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE, OR THE BALTIMORE
COUNTY POLICE DEPARTMENT AS BEING AT HIGH RISK FOR MOTOR VEHICLE
CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.
2. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SPECIFIED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE PLACED WITHIN 5 MILES OF
ANOTHER SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATING IN THE SAME DIRECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY PLACE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS THAT
MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF MOTOR
VEHICLES TRAVELING ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(II) 1. NOT MORE THAN THREE SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEMS IN EACH DIRECTION MAY BE OPERATED ON A HIGHWAY SPECIFIED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AT LOCATIONS IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE, OR THE BALTIMORE
COUNTY POLICE DEPARTMENT AS BEING AT HIGH RISK FOR MOTOR VEHICLE
CRASHES THAT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.

HOUSE BILL 978 5
2. A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SPECIFIED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE PLACED WITHIN 5 MILES OF
ANOTHER SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATING IN THE SAME DIRECTION.
(3) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH
(1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED ONLY:
(I) WHEN BEING OPERATED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR; AND
(II) 1. IF ALL SPEED LIMIT SIGNS APPROACHING AND
WITHIN THE SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY ON WHICH THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS
LOCATED INCLUDE CONSPICUOUS SIGNS THAT:
A. ARE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND MANUAL
ON UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES; AND
B. INDICATE THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN
USE; AND
2. IF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION ENSURES
THAT EACH SIGN THAT INDICATES THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN USE IS
PROXIMATE TO A DEVICE THAT DISPLAYS A REAL–TIME POSTING OF THE SPEED AT
WHICH A DRIVER IS TRAVELING.
(II) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR NEED NOT BE
PRESENT IN PERSON OR REMOTELY AT THE HIGHWAY CORRIDOR WHERE A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN USE.
(4) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED ON INTERSTATE
695 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY MAY BE USED ONLY TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF
VEHICLES THAT ARE TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT LEAST 12 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE
THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
(II) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED ON INTERSTATE
83 IN BALTIMORE COUNTY MAY BE USED ONLY TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF
VEHICLES THAT ARE TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT LEAST 12 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE
THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
(5) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL
COMPLETE TRAINING BY THE MANUFACTURER OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
IN THE PROCEDURES FOR SETTING UP, TESTING, AND OPERATING THE SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 978
(II) ON COMPLETION OF THE TRAINING, THE MANUFACTURER
SHALL ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE TO THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR.
(III) THE CERTIFICATE OF TRAINING SHALL BE ADMITTED AS
EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(6) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL FILL OUT AND
SIGN A DAILY SET–UP LOG FOR A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM THAT:
(I) STATES THE DATE AND TIME WHEN AND THE LOCATION
WHERE THE SYSTEM WAS SET UP;
(II) STATES THAT THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR
SUCCESSFULLY PERFORMED, AND THE DEVICE PASSED, THE
MANUFACTURER–SPECIFIED SELF–TESTS OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
BEFORE PRODUCING A RECORDED IMAGE;
(III) SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
(IV) SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SHALL UNDERGO AN
ANNUAL CALIBRATION CHECK PERFORMED BY AN INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION
LABORATORY.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY SHALL
ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE OF CALIBRATION AFTER THE ANNUAL CALIBRATION
CHECK THAT:
1. SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
2. SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(8) THE PROCUREMENT OF A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 1
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER
OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, THE DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF AN IMAGE OF THE MOTOR

HOUSE BILL 978 7
VEHICLE IS RECORDED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION WHILE BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $40.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL:
(I) PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) INDICATE ON THE CITATION THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL
PENALTY TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR A CONTRACTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL MAIL TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) THE LOCATION WHERE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(VI) AT LEAST ONE RECORDED IMAGE OF THE VEHICLE WITH A
DATA BAR IMPRINTED ON EACH IMAGE THAT INCLUDES THE SPEED OF THE VEHICLE
AND THE DATE AND TIME THE IMAGE WAS RECORDED;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY SHOULD BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT BY A POLICE OFFICER EMPLOYED BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR A CONTRACTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
STATE POLICE THAT, BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES, THE MOTOR
VEHICLE WAS BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 978
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT RECORDED IMAGES ARE EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
(XI) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER:
1. IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY;
2. MAY RESULT IN THE REFUSAL TO REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
3. MAY RESULT IN THE SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL MAIL A WARNING
NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION DURING THE FIRST 90 30 DAYS THAT THE SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM IS IN OPERATION.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE MAY NOT MAIL A CITATION TO A PERSON WHO
IS NOT AN OWNER.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, A
CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2
WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN THE
STATE, AND NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE
VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 978 9
(E) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE OCCURRED AND THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION HAVE BEEN SATISFIED, SWORN TO, OR AFFIRMED BY AN OFFICER OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE, BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES
PRODUCED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS
CONTAINED IN THE CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING
ALLEGING A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT THE PRESENCE OR
TESTIMONY OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR WHO PERFORMED THE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVED A CITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION DESIRES A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR TO BE
PRESENT AND TESTIFY AT TRIAL, THE PERSON SHALL NOTIFY THE COURT AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE IN WRITING NOT LATER THAN 20 DAYS BEFORE
TRIAL.
(3) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE.
(F) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE VEHICLE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT DEEMS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER SHALL SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT
REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN
A TIMELY MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE

HOUSE BILL 978
TO THE DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND
MAILED BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS
NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) INCLUDES ANY OTHER CORROBORATING EVIDENCE.
(4) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION,
THE CLERK OF THE COURT MAY PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT
THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PERSON WHO THE EVIDENCE INDICATES
WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) ANY CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.
(G) IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER THE REGISTRATION OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR THE VIOLATION; OR
(2) SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR
THE VIOLATION.
(H) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE
DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE VEHICLE;

HOUSE BILL 978 11
(3) MAY BE TREATED AS A PARKING VIOLATION FOR PURPOSES OF §
26–305 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(I) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE, THE
CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF CITATIONS, THE TRIAL OF CIVIL VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION
OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(J) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR A CONTRACTOR
DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL ADMINISTER AND
PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH
THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR PROVIDES, DEPLOYS, OR OPERATES A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON
THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
(K) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE AND THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION JOINTLY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING
STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS AUTHORIZED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1 in
calendar years 2026 through 2028, the State Highway Administration shall report to the
members of the Baltimore County Delegation to the General Assembly, in accordance with
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the revenue collected and distributed by the
State Highway Administration from the speed monitoring systems authorized under §
21–811 of the Transportation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and 1 month and, at the end
of June 30, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.